src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
strong_geminate, long_vowel, no_palatalization, low_stem_vowel
* :%^V2VV A-02_A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	  (2) Pl.Nom: peess
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

strong_geminate, long_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%> A-01_PIISSUZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: piissuž
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV%> A-01_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: pẹẹssaž

Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_long:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem
Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
N_A-URaise3-32
* Yaml: **soomm**
grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-02_A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    		 (1) Sg.Nom: šoomm
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* :%^CC2C A-02_A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;		 (2) Pl.Nom: šoom
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
* :%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u A-02_SG-ILL ; 		 (3) Sg.Ill: šummu
Sg_Ill

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* :%^VV2V A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) šomm
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
* :%>a A-02_ESS/PAR ; 	     			 (6) Ess: šoomman

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^VOWRaise%^CC2C%> A-01_PIISSUZH ;	 (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: šuumuž
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^CC2C%> A-01_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: šoomaž

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-02_A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			 (1) äldd
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A-02_A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;  (2) ääld
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
* :%^VOWRaise%>u A-02_SG-ILL ;		      	 (3) alddu
Sg_Ill

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;	    	   (5) äldd
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
* :%>a A-02_ESS/PAR ;	   		    	 (6) älddan

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^YXX2YX A-01_PIISSUZH ;  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: aalduž (2009: 312-313)
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%> A-01_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: ääldaž

grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)

* LEXICON A-02_A-STEM_SG-NOM  (1)
* LEXICON A-02_A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM   (2)

CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, DIPHTHONG, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem_long
Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.0 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.0.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.0.2.0 Lack Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.0.2.0[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-neavvv**
* : A-02_A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			  neävˈv
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

* :%^CCC2CC A-02_A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	  neävv
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

* :%^VOWRaise%>u A-02_SG-ILL ;			  niâvˈvu
Sg_Ill

* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) neävˈv
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

* :%>a A-02_ESS/PAR ;   	       			 neävˈvan

* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^VOWRaise%^CCC2CC%> A-01_PIISSUZH ;   niâvvuž
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^CCC2CC%> A-01_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: neävvaž

similar_to: N_PLAAN
gradation: no
vowel_shift: no
Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
* Yaml: **N-pealdd**
* : A-02_A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    		  kapteän
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

* : A-02_A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	  kapteän
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

* :%>a A-02_SG-ILL ;		  kapteän
Sg_Ill

* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) kapteän
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

* :%>a A-02_ESS/PAR ;   	       		  kapteänan

* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^YXX2YX%> A-01_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: kapteänaž

Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_long:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem_dd_type
Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc, No gradation
N_A-U1-11
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (no vowel shift, all lowered)
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.2 Lacks Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.2[] (Monophthong + Consonant)
Weak grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Weak grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **A-vaeaezhzh**
* : A-02_SG-NOM ;	    		 vääžž
* : A-02_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 vääžž
* :%^VOWRaise%>u A-02_SG-ILL ;		 vaažžu
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>a A-02_SG-ILL ;  	      	 vääžža
* :%>a A-02_SG-LOC ;	   		 vääžžast
* :%>a A-02_SG-COM_IN ;		 vääžžain
* :%>a A-02_ESS/PAR ;     			 vääžžan
* :%>a A-02_PL-OBL ;			 vääžžai
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^VOWRaise A-01_PIISSUZH ;	 vaažžuž
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A: A-01_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: vääžžaž
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/Dimin+N: N_KUYLAZH ;   	 vääžžaž

CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL TYPE, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

* Yaml: **N-nubb**
* There are several stem types
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) nubb
* :%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro%^PALK E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) nuʹbb-
* :%^PAL%^PALK  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) nuʹbb Ess+Px..

*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) nubb
* :%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) nuʹbb-
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) nuʹbb Ess+Px..

Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high_u:pal_yes:cns_gem_dd_type
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113"
* Yaml: **N-nubb**
* There are several stem types
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) nubb
* :%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) nuʹbb-
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) nuʹbb Ess+Px..

Bahuvriihi: årddnjuuʹnn
* Yaml: **N-njuunn**

*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) njuunn-
* :%^VV2V%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) njuʹn-
* :%^VV2V%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) njuʹnn Ess+Px..

## FORMS
## (1) Sg.Nom: juʹvjj
## (2) Pl.Nom: juuʹj
## (3) Sg.Ill: joujja
## (4) Sg.Loc: juuʹjest
## (5) Sg.Com: juuʹjin
## (6) Ess: juʹvjjen
## (7) Par: juʹvjjed
## (8) Pl.Acc: juuʹjid
## (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: joujjaž
NumContLex="1.113"
Is for nouns with *-est* Loc, Extra long vowel
* Yaml: **N-juvjj**
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) juvjj-
* :%^VV2V%^PAL%^YXX2VX E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) juʹj-
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) juʹvjj Ess+Px..

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180, 197-199)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant and Geminate variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Dim
## FORMS
## (1) Sg.Nom: kueʹll
## (2) Pl.Nom: kueʼl
## (3) Sg.Ill: kuâlˈla
## (4) Sg.Loc: kueʹlest
## (5) Sg.Com: kuõʹlin ~ kueʹlin
## (6) Ess: kueʹllen
## (7) Par: kueʹlled
## (8) Pl.Acc: kuõʹlid ~ kueʹlid
## (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: kuâlaž 
* Yaml: **N-kuell**
* There are several stem types 
* kueʹll:kuâll

*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) kuâll-
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) kueʹl-
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) kueʹlˈl Ess+Px..

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113"
Is for nouns with *-est* Loc, Extra long vowel
* Yaml: **N-muerjj**
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^YXX2YX DenominalAdjsCShort ; 
* :%^PALE%^PAL A-02_E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  	 (1) Sg.Nom: mueʹrjj
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	 (2) Pl.Nom: mueʹrj
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_PL-NOM ;	 (2) Pl.Nom: mueʹrj
* : A-02_E-STEM_SG-ILL ;  		     	 (3) Sg.Nom: muârjja
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^YXX2YX%>e A-02_SG-LOC ;		 (4) Sg.Loc: mueʹrjest
* :%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_SG-COM_IN ;  (5) Sg.Com: muõʹrjin
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^PALE%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_SG-COM_IN ;  (5) Sg.Com:  mueʹrjin
* :%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_E-STEM_PL-OBL ;  (5) Sg.Com: muõʹrjin
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^PALE%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_E-STEM_PL-OBL ;  (5) Sg.Com:  mueʹrjin
* :%^PALE%^PAL%>e A-02_ESS/PAR ; 	 		   (6) Pl.Nom: mueʹrjjen
* :%^YXX2YX A-02_E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ;		   (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: muârjaž
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) muârjj-
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^YXX2YX E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) mueʹrj-
* :%^PALE%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) mueʹrjj Ess+Px..
